Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.027

Statutorily authorized taxing authority.

After June 7, 2012, the statutorily authorized taxing authority of a public facility [facilities] district may not be restricted in any manner by the forming jurisdiction or jurisdictions or by any action of the public facility [facilities] district.

[ 2012 c 4 s 4.]